Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.101

Facsimile signatures on bonds and coupons—Fraud—Destruction of plates—Penalty.

Every printer, engraver, or lithographer, who with the intent to defraud, prints, engraves, or lithographs a facsimile signature upon any bond or coupon without written order of the issuing authority, or fails to destroy such plate or plates containing the facsimile signature upon direction of such issuing authority, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 212; 1955 c 375 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Fraud, forgery: Chapter 9A.60 RCW.